nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Båt og vannsport > Windfoiling > Windfoil-utstyr > Windfoiling – beskyttelsesutstyr: Hjelmer til vindfoiling; Støtvester til vindfoiling; Pads og beskyttelse til vindfoiling
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 水上運動 > 水翼風翼 > 水翼風翼配件 > 水翼風翼護具: 風帆水翼安全帽; 風帆水翼防撞背心; 風帆水翼護墊與護具
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Plimbări cu barca și sporturi nautice > Windfoiling > Accesorii pentru windfoil > Echipamente de protecție pentru windfoiling: Căști pentru windfoiling; Veste de impact pentru windfoiling; Perne de protecție și apărători pentru windfoiling
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Veneily ja vesiurheilu > Siipilautailu > Siipilautailuvarusteet > Siipilautailun suojavarusteet: Windfoil-kypärät; Windfoil-iskuliivit; Windfoil-pehmusteet ja -suojat
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Desportos náuticos e aquáticos > Windfoil > Acessórios de windfoil > Equipamento de proteção para windfoil: Capacetes para windfoil; Coletes de impacto para windfoil; Almofadas e proteções para windfoil
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Plovidba i vodeni sportovi > Windfoiling > Dodaci za windfoiling > Zaštitna oprema za windfoiling: Kacige za windfoiling; Prsluci za zaštitu od udara za windfoiling; Jastučići i štitnici za windfoiling
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kayıkçılık ve Su Sporları > Windfoil > Windfoil Aksesuarları > Windfoil Koruyucu Donanımı: Windfoil kaskları; Windfoil darbe yelekleri; Windfoil ped ve korumaları
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Boot- & Wassersport > Windfoiling > Zubehör für Windfoiling > Schutzausrüstung für Windfoiling: Windfoil-Helme; Prallschutzwesten für Windfoiling; Pads & Protektoren für Windfoiling
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Plovba in vodni športi > Jadranje s foilom > Dodatki za jadranje s foilom > Zaščitna oprema za jadranje s foilom: Čelade za hidrokrilno windsurfanje; Zaščitni jopiči za hidrokrilno windsurfanje; Zaščitne podloge in ščitniki za hidrokrilno windsurfanje
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lodě a vodní sporty > Windfoiling > Windfoil – doplňky > Windfoiling – ochranné pomůcky: Helmy na windfoiling; Nárazové vesty pro windfoiling; Podložky a chrániče pro windfoiling
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Båt- och vattensporter > Windfoiling > Windfoil-tillbehör > Skyddsutrustning för windfoiling: Hjälmar för vindfoiling; Slagvästar för vindfoiling; Pads och skydd för vindfoiling
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Boten en watersport > Windfoiling > Windfoil accessoires > Windfoilbeschermingsuitrusting: Windfoil-helmen; Windfoil-impactvesten; Windfoil-pads en -beschermers
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ναυσιπλοΐα & θαλάσσια σπορ > Windfoiling > Αξεσουάρ Windfoil > Εξοπλισμός προστασίας Windfoiling: Κράνη windfoil; Γιλέκα κρούσης windfoil; Pads και προστατευτικά windfoil
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ウォータースポーツ・アクティビティ > ウィンドフォイル > ウィンドフォイルアクセサリー > ウィンドフォイル用プロテクター: ウィンドフォイル用ヘルメット; ウィンドフォイル用インパクトベスト; ウィンドフォイル用パッド・ガード
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Csónakázás és vízi sportok > Szélszörfözés > Szélszörfözési kiegészítők > Szélszörfözési védőfelszerelés: Windfoil sisakok; Windfoil ütésvédő mellények; Windfoil védőbetétek és -burkolatok
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Canoagem e esportes aquáticos > Windfoiling > Acessórios de windfoil > Equipamentos de proteção para windfoil: Capacetes para windfoil; Coletes de impacto para windfoil; Pads e protetores para windfoil
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กีฬาทางเรือและทางน้ำ > วินด์ฟอยล์ > อุปกรณ์วินด์ฟอยล์ > อุปกรณ์ป้องกันสำหรับวินด์ฟอยล์: หมวกกันน็อควินด์ฟอยล์; เสื้อกันกระแทกวินด์ฟอยล์; แผ่นรองและที่ป้องกันวินด์ฟอยล์
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Sport acquatici > Windfoil > Accessori per windfoil > Attrezzatura protettiva per windfoil: Caschi da windfoil; Giubbotti antiurto da windfoil; Pad e protezioni da windfoil
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Boating & Water Sports > Windfoiling > Windfoil Accessories > Windfoiling Protective Gear: Windfoiling Helmets; Windfoiling Impact Vests; Windfoiling Pads & Guards
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Člnkovanie a vodné športy > Windfoiling > Príslušenstvo k windfoilingu > Ochranné vybavenie k windfoilingu: Prilby na windfoiling; Ochranné vesty na windfoiling; Podložky a chrániče proti vetru
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Plaisance et sports nautiques > Windfoil > Accessoires pour windfoil > Équipement de protection pour le windfoil: Casques de windfoil; Gilets d’impact de windfoil; Pads et protections de windfoil
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Chèo thuyền và thể thao dưới nước > Lướt ván gió > Phụ kiện lướt ván gió > Đồ bảo hộ môn lướt ván gió: Mũ bảo hiểm windfoil; Áo chống va đập windfoil; Tấm lót và phụ kiện bảo vệ windfoil
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Plaukiojimas valtimis ir vandens sportas > Orlenčių sportas > Orlenčių priedai > Orlenčių apsauginės priemonės: Windfoil šalmai; Windfoil smūgiams atsparios liemenės; Windfoil paminkštinimai ir apsaugos
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Deportes acuáticos y navegación deportiva > Windfoiling > Accesorios para windfoil > Equipo de protección para el windfoiling: Cascos para windfoil; Chalecos de impacto para windfoil; Almohadillas y protectores para windfoil
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 보트 놀이/수상 스포츠 > 윈드포일링 > 윈드포일 액세서리 > 윈드포일 보호 장비: 윈드포일 헬멧; 윈드포일 임팩트 조끼; 윈드포일 패드 및 가드
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Sejling og vandsport > Windfoiling > Tilbehør til windfoil > Beskyttelsesudstyr til windfoil: Hjelme til windfoil; Impact-veste til windfoil; Pads og beskyttere til windfoil
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Żegluga i sporty wodne > Windfoiling > Akcesoria do windfoila > Stroje ochronne do windfoilingu: Kaski do windfoila; Kamizelki uderzeniowe do windfoila; Ochraniacze i podkładki do windfoila
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 划船/水上运动 > 风帆冲浪 > 风帆冲浪配件 > 风帆冲浪防护装备: 风帆水翼头盔; 风帆水翼防撞背心; 风帆水翼护垫与护具
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Гребля и водные виды спорта > Виндфойлинг > Аксессуары для виндфойлинга > Защитная экипировка для виндфойлинга: Шлемы для виндфойлинга; Противоударные жилеты для виндфойлинга; Накладки и защита для виндфойлинга
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Плаване с лодка и водни спортове > Уиндфойл > Аксесоари за уингфойл > Защитна екипировка за уингфойл: Каски за уиндфойл; Ударни жилетки за уиндфойл; Подложки и протектори за уиндфойл